West Virginia, session 2026, HB5634.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. Broadband enhancement council. §31G-1-10. Last-Mile Broadband for Coalfield Counties Act; coalfield broadband expansion. (a) This bill establishes the Last-Mile Broadband for Coalfield Counties Act to provide for coalfield broadband expansion.(b) Broadband eligibility shall be based on verified service availability and speed testing.(c) Priority recipients include schools, bus garages, emergency services, and unserved communities.(d) Preference shall be given to regional broadband projects involving counties, municipalities, and public agencies.(e) For purposes of this section, the term "coalfield county" means any county in the state of West Virginia that has:(1)  Historically had coal mining within its boundaries;(2)  Economically benefitted, or presently benefits, from the coal mining industry within its boundaries;(3) Historically had economic activity ancillary, or related, to the coal mining industry within its boundaries; or(4) Otherwise been, or will be, significantly affected by the coal mining industry.